North Carolina, session 2025, SB141.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Males Place, Inc., to assist
the organization in providing weekly mentoring for African American boys between the ages of
12 to 18.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S141-v-1*